District of Columbia statutes.
46-352.08

Child-support orders for 2 or more obligees.

In responding to registrations or petitions for enforcement of 2 or more child-support orders in effect at the same time with regard to the same obligor and different individual obligees, at least one of which was issued by a tribunal of another state or a foreign country, a tribunal of the District shall enforce those orders in the same manner as if the orders had been issued by a tribunal of the District.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 208, 63 DCR 222